Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-303
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, the definitions found in sections 20-304 to 20-317 shall be used.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 4.